Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Part 5

Creditor's Claims — Mandatory, Support and Discretionary Interests — Effect of Spendthrift Provision

35-15-501. Application; rights of beneficiary's creditor or assignee.

This part applies to a creditor's or assignee's claims and ability to reach mandatory, support and discretionary interests regardless of whether such interests are subject to a spendthrift provision. To the extent not otherwise prohibited by this part, the court may authorize a creditor or assignee of the beneficiary to reach the beneficiary's distribution interest by attachment of present or future distributions to or for the benefit of the beneficiary or other means. The court may limit the award to such relief as is appropriate under the circumstances.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 40; 2007, ch. 24, § 21; 2013, ch. 390, § 15.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 56; 22 Tenn. Juris., Spendthrift Trusts, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, Pro and Con (Law): Considering the Irrevocable Nongrantor Trust Technique, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1999 (2014).

1. Spendthrift Provision.

Appellate court construed trust as restraining the voluntary and involuntary transfer of farm property itself, but also as allowing a beneficiary to voluntarily transfer a year's worth of income from the property; thus, that portion of the spendthrift provision pertaining to voluntary alienation of farm income was invalid, and debtor's interest in that income was subject to execution. Atkins v. Marks, 288 S.W.3d 356, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 349 (Tenn. Ct. App. June 11, 2008), rehearing denied, 288 S.W.3d 356, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 449 (Tenn. Ct. App. July 15, 2008).

General Comment.

The provisions of part five (5) of the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code diverge, in many cases significantly, from the provisions contained in Uniform Trust Code, as well as from the Restatement (Third) of Trusts, on which much of part 5 of the Uniform Trust Code was based. To the extent part 5 is in conflict with the Uniform Trust Code, any restatement or any other foreign law, such foreign law is not precedential or controlling and is rejected by the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code.

Part five (5) of the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code offers far more creditor protection to trusts and their beneficiaries than does the Uniform Trust Code or the Restatement (Third) of Trusts. This is achieved in a number of ways, some of which are enumerated hereafter.

Relative to spendthrift trusts, T.C.A. § 35-15-503 contains no exception creditors other than the state of Tennessee, and then only to the extent that a statute of the state of Tennessee so provides. The protection given by the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code to discretionary trusts is far broader than that provided by the Uniform Trust Code and, unlike under the latter, there are no exception creditors relative to an interest held in a discretionary trust.

Under the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code, a discretionary interest held in a trust (a “discretionary trust”) does not require a spendthrift provision in order to gain the protective benefits or attributes of a discretionary interest. Such protective benefits an attributes are inherent in such interest.

When combined with the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code’s definition of what constitutes a discretionary trust, only a limited number of the types of trusts typically used for donative purposes do not obtain the benefit of such creditor protection. This is in keeping with the objective of the Tennessee trust statutes that a settlor should have the broadest freedom to dispose of their assets to whom, and in the manner, they wish (and to only those persons, and in only such manner, as a settlor wishes). Such creditor protection respects that the assets in the trust initially belonged to the settlor and not the beneficiary. When those assets are put in a discretionary trust, the beneficiary obtained only beneficial rights that do not rise to the status of a property interest and, therefore, cannot be reached by creditors, even absent a spendthrift provision. Under the Tennessee trust statutes, an irrevocable special needs trust is shielded from claims by creditors of the settlor regardless of whether or not such trust complies with the provisions of chapter 16, the Tennessee Investment Services Trust Act. Finally, any interest of a beneficiary under a support trust likewise does not rise to the status of a property interest and is therefore protected from creditors, even absent a spendthrift provision.

Notwithstanding the above, the Tennessee trust statutes still respect the right of beneficiaries of support and mandatory interests to obtain redress for a trustee’s failure to respect such interests due such beneficiaries under them. However, no creditor of any such beneficiary has such right and can only reach a distribution made from such interests after the distribution is made and then in only specified circumstances.

The provisions of this part relating to the validity and effect of a spendthrift provision, as well as the rights of certain creditors and assignees to reach a spendthrift trust, or a mandatory, support or discretionary interest, may not be modified by the terms of the trust. See T.C.A. § 35-15-105(b).

This part does not generally supersede this state’s exemption statutes nor this state’s Uniform Fraudulent Transfers Act, T.C.A. title 66, chapter 3, part 3. Nevertheless, certain provisions of this part modify certain provisions of such act.

Section Comment.

The section generally describes the overall application of title 35, part 5.

It also states that, to the extent not otherwise prohibited by such part 5, a court may authorize a creditor or assignee of the beneficiary to reach the beneficiary’s distribution interest by attachment of present or future distributions to or for the benefit of the beneficiary or other means.

Finally, it grants such court the discretion to limit any such award to any such creditor or assignee to such relief as is appropriate under the circumstances.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

35-15-502. Spendthrift provision.

A spendthrift provision is valid only if it restrains both voluntary and involuntary transfer of a beneficiary's interest.

A term of a trust providing that the interest of a beneficiary is held subject to a “spendthrift trust,” or words of similar import, is sufficient to restrain both voluntary and involuntary transfer of the beneficiary's interest.

A spendthrift provision applies to all beneficial interests, including distribution interests and remainder interests.

A beneficiary may not transfer an interest in a trust in violation of a valid spendthrift provision and a creditor or assignee of the beneficiary may not reach any of, the interest, or a present, future or prospective distribution at the trust level. Similarly, no creditor or assignee of the beneficiary may force any distribution from the trust. This subsection (d) remains applicable regardless of the beneficiary's potential right to force a distribution under § 35-15-814.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, regardless of whether a beneficiary has any outstanding creditor, a trustee, cotrustee or other fiduciary of a trust subject to a spendthrift provision may directly pay any expense on behalf of such beneficiary and may exhaust the income and principal of the trust for the benefit of such beneficiary. No trustee, cotrustee or other fiduciary is liable to any creditor for paying the expenses of a beneficiary under a trust subject to a spendthrift provision. This subsection (e) remains applicable regardless of whether the beneficiary for whom such direct payment was made held a mandatory, support, discretionary or remainder interest.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 41; 2013, ch. 390, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 56; 22 Tenn. Juris., Spendthrift Trusts, § 1.

1. Validity.

Appellate court construed trust as restraining the voluntary and involuntary transfer of farm property itself, but also as allowing a beneficiary to voluntarily transfer a year's worth of income from the property; thus, that portion of the spendthrift provision pertaining to voluntary alienation of farm income was invalid, and debtor's interest in that income was subject to execution. Atkins v. Marks, 288 S.W.3d 356, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 349 (Tenn. Ct. App. June 11, 2008), rehearing denied, 288 S.W.3d 356, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 449 (Tenn. Ct. App. July 15, 2008).

Section Comment.

Unless provided otherwise hereinafter, any reference to “section,” “subsection” or “subdivision” means all, or such portion of, T.C.A. § 35-15-502.

This section addresses the effects of a spendthrift provision as such is defined in T.C.A. § 35-15-103, on any type of trust and on any type of beneficial interest under such trust.

The provisions of this section in some ways diverge significantly from the Uniform Trust Code and the restatements. To the extent this section is in conflict with the Uniform Trust Code, any restatement or any other foreign law, such foreign law is not precedential or controlling and is rejected by the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code.

Spendthrift provisions and the effects thereof are also discussed in other places throughout the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code and its comments. Two notable places a reader is directed are; the section comments related to the term “spendthrift provision” in T.C.A. § 35-15-103; and the comments under the heading “Part 5. Creditor’s Claims; Spend-thrift and Discretionary Trusts.” in T.C.A. § 35-15-101.

Subsection (a) provides that for a spendthrift provision to be effective under the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code, it must prohibit both the voluntary and involuntary transfer of the beneficiary’s interest. That is to say, a settlor may not allow a beneficiary to assign while prohibiting a beneficiary’s creditor from collecting, and vice versa. See Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 58 cmt. b (Tentative Draft No. 2, approved 1999). See also Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 152(2) (1959). A spendthrift provision valid under the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code will also be recognized as valid in a federal bankruptcy proceeding. See 11 U.S.C. § 541 (c)(2).

Subsection (b) allows a settlor to provide maximum spendthrift protection simply by stating in the instrument that all interests are held subject to a “spendthrift trust” or words of similar effect.

Subsection (c) provides that a settlor has the power to restrain the transfer of a beneficiary’s interest, regardless of whether the beneficiary has a beneficial interest in income, in principal, or in both and regardless of whether such interest is or derives from any type of distribution interest (mandatory, support or discretionary) or is a remainder interest. A creditor of the beneficiary is prohibited from attaching a protected interest and may only attempt to collect directly from the beneficiary after payment is made.

Subsection (d) provides that a spendthrift provision blocks any creditor or assignee (hereinafter in the comments to this section, individually and collectively, simply “creditor”) of a beneficiary from reaching any interest of such beneficiary, as well as any present, future or prospective distribution at the trust level. Likewise, no creditor can force any distribution from the trust. This remains true despite the fact that a beneficiary under mandatory and support interests may potentially force a distribution under T.C.A. § 35-15-814.

Subsection (e) provides that the existence of any creditor of any beneficiary of a trust with a spendthrift provision in no way impacts any trustee’s, cotrustee’s or other fiduciary’s (hereinafter in the comments to this section, individually and collectively, simply “fiduciary”) right or ability to directly pay any expense on behalf of such beneficiary; and such fiduciary may exhaust a trust for the benefit of such beneficiary. In other words a fiduciary need not make a distribution from a trust subject to a spendthrift provision directly to a beneficiary. Instead such fiduciary has the power to directly pay to a third party any expense for the benefit of such beneficiary and no creditor may reach such payment. If a fiduciary makes such a direct payment, it is not possible for such fiduciary to incur liability to any creditor for so doing. This remains true regardless of the beneficiary for which such payment was made held a mandatory, support, discretionary or remainder interest.

A disclaimer, because it is a refusal to accept ownership of an interest and not a transfer of an interest already owned, is not affected by the presence or absence of a spendthrift provision. Most disclaimer statutes expressly provide that the validity of a disclaimer is not affected by a spendthrift protection. See, e.g ., Uniform Probate Code § 2-801(a). Releases and exercises of powers of appointment are also not affected because they are not transfers of property. See Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 58 cmt. c (Tentative Draft No. 2, approved 1999).

Except as otherwise provided in T.C.A. § 35-15-505, a spendthrift provision is ineffective against a beneficial interest retained by a settlor up to the maximum amount that can be distributed to or for such settlor’s benefit.

A valid spendthrift provision makes it impossible for a beneficiary to make a legally binding assignment or transfer, but the appropriate fiduciary may voluntarily choose to honor such beneficiary’s purported assignment or transfer, such being in reality a revocable direction or request to the trustee to pay amounts otherwise distributable to the beneficiary to the purported assignee. Note that under the immediately preceding sentence a beneficiary’s purported assignment relative to a discretionary interest may have little if any practical effect. That is because the amounts “otherwise distributable to the beneficiary” are subject to the trustee’s discretion. An appropriate fiduciary is protected, and is under no liability for, honoring such beneficiary’s request, but must cease doing so upon instruction from such beneficiary. Should an appropriate fiduciary decide to honor such beneficiary’s request, such fiduciary can decide to cease to so honor it and may recommence distributions to the beneficiary at anytime. Moreover, because the beneficiary has not made a binding transfer, such beneficiary can withdraw the beneficiary’s direction but only as to future payments. See Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 58 cmt. d (Tentative Draft No. 2, approved 1999); Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 152 cmt. i (1959), but the extent such restatements are in conflict with this paragraph, this paragraph and the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code controls.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

35-15-503. Exceptions to spendthift provision.

A spendthrift provision is unenforceable against a claim of this state to the extent a statute of this state so provides.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 42.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 22 Tenn. Juris., Spendthrift Trusts, § 1.

35-15-504. Discretionary interests — Effect thereof.

A discretionary interest is neither a property interest nor an enforceable right; it is a mere expectancy.

Relative to a discretionary interest, whether or not a trust contains a spendthrift provision:

No creditor or assignee shall force or otherwise reach a distribution with regard to a discretionary interest;

No creditor or assignee shall require a trustee, cotrustee or other fiduciary to exercise the trustee's, cotrustee's or other fiduciary's discretion to make a distribution with regard to a discretionary interest;

Regardless of whether a beneficiary has any outstanding creditors or assignees, a trustee, cotrustee or other fiduciary of a discretionary interest may directly pay any expense on behalf of such beneficiary and may exhaust the income and principal of the trust for the benefit of such beneficiary;

No trustee, cotrustee or other fiduciary is liable to any creditor or assignee for paying the expenses of a beneficiary of a discretionary interest;

Regardless of whether a beneficiary holding a discretionary interest is also a trustee, cotrustee or other fiduciary, subdivisions (b)(1)-(4) remain applicable if:

The beneficiary-fiduciary does not have the discretion to make or participate in making distributions to such beneficiary-fiduciary;

The beneficiary-fiduciary's discretion to make or participate in making distributions to such beneficiary-fiduciary is limited by an ascertainable standard; or

The beneficiary-fiduciary's discretion to make or participate in making distributions to such beneficiary-fiduciary is exercisable only with the consent of a cotrustee or another person holding an adverse interest.

A creditor or assignee may compel or otherwise reach a distribution only to the extent the creditor or assignee may compel or otherwise reach a distribution if the beneficiary was not acting as a trustee, cotrustee or other fiduciary.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 43; 2007, ch. 24, § 22; 2013, ch. 390, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 22 Tenn. Juris., Spendthrift Trusts, § 1.

Section Comment.

Unless provided otherwise hereinafter, any reference to “section,” “subsection” or “subdivision” means all, or such portion of, T.C.A. § 35-15-504.

The provisions of this section diverge significantly from the Uniform Trust Code and the restatements. To the ex-tent this section is in conflict with the Uniform Trust Code, any restatement or any other foreign law, such foreign law is not precedential or controlling and is rejected by the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code.

This section addresses the effect of a trust (a “discretionary trust”) containing a distribution interest that is a discretionary interest. Unlike the Uniform Trust Code and Restatement (Third) of Trusts, the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code maintains the traditional common law distinction between a trust having a discretionary interest (a “discretionary trust”) and a trust having a support interest (a “support trust”).

These distinctions and the general effects thereof are also discussed in other places throughout the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code and its comments. Two notable places a reader is directed are; the section comments related to the term “discretionary interest” in T.C.A. § 35-15-103; and the comments under the heading “Part 5. Creditor’s Claims; Spendthrift and Discretionary Trusts.” in T.C.A. § 35-15-101.

Subsection (a) expresses the traditional common law rule that a discretionary interest under a trust is not a property interest. Therefore it is not an enforceable right, but only a mere expectancy. Because a discretionary interest is only an unenforceable expectancy and not a property interest, such can in no way “belong” to any beneficiary in their capacity as a beneficiary. The provisions of subsection (a) diverge significantly from the Uniform Trust Code and the restatements. To the subsection (a) is in conflict with the Uniform Trust Code, any restatement or any other foreign law, such foreign law is not precedential or controlling and is rejected by the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code.

Subsection (b) expresses both the traditional common law view regarding the effects of, as well as what is simply the logical outcome of, the fact a discretionary interest is not a property interest, is not an enforceable right and is only an expectancy. The provisions of subsection (b) diverge significantly from the Uniform Trust Code and the restatements. To the subsection (b) is in conflict with the Uniform Trust Code, any restatement or any other foreign law, such foreign law is not precedential or controlling and is rejected by the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code.

The traditional common law view regarding the effects of, as well as what is simply the logical outcome of, the fact a discretionary interest is not a property interest, is not an enforceable right and is only an expectancy follow Relative to a discretionary interest:

A spendthrift provision is not required in order to gain any protective benefits or attributes of a discretionary interest. Such protective benefits and attributes are inherent in such interest.

No creditor or assignee (hereinafter in the comments to this section, individually and collectively, simply “creditor”) has the ability to force or otherwise reach a distribution.

No creditor has the ability to force a trustee, cotrustee or other fiduciary (hereinafter in the comments to this section, individually and collectively, simply “fiduciary”) to exercise discretion relative to such interest.

The existence of any creditor of any beneficiary in no way impacts a fiduciary’s right or ability to directly pay any expense on behalf of such beneficiary; and such fiduciary may exhaust a trust for the benefit of such beneficiary. In other words a fiduciary need not make a discretionary distribution to a beneficiary. Instead such fiduciary has the power to directly pay to a third party any expense for the benefit of such beneficiary and no creditor may reach such payment. If a fiduciary makes such a direct payment, it is not possible for such fiduciary to incur liability to any creditor for so doing.

Despite a beneficiary also being a fiduciary, all of the above holds trust so long as:

the beneficiary-fiduciary has no discretion to make or participate in making any distribution to such beneficiary-fiduciary; or

the beneficiary-fiduciary has discretion to make or participate in making any distribution to such beneficiary-fiduciary, but such discretion is limited by an ascertainable standard; or

the beneficiary-fiduciary has discretion to make or participate in making any distribution to such beneficiary-fiduciary, but such discretion is only exercisable with the consent of another fiduciary or another person having an interest adverse to such beneficiary-fiduciary.

In any event, a creditor of a beneficiary-fiduciary cannot compel or otherwise reach a distribution to a greater extent than could such creditor compel or otherwise reach a distribution if the beneficiary was not also acting as a fiduciary.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.